Arkansas, session 2025, HB1107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Department of Human Services - Division of County Operations for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N249N DHS DIVISION DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE02
(2) L013N GENERAL PHYSICIAN 1 GRADE MP06
(3) L038C REGISTERED NURSE 2 GRADE MP01
(4) D063C COMPUTER SUPPORT SPECIALIST 2 GRADE IT05
*LCW013*
02-27-2025 14:22:22 LCW013

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1107
(5) D071C COMPUTER SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE IT03
(6) D079C COMPUTER SUPPORT TECHNICIAN 2 GRADE IT02
(7) G286C DMS DEPUTY DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS15
(8) N102N DHS/DCO ASSISTANT DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS14
(9) N080N DHS/DMS ASSISTANT DIRECTOR - FISCAL 1 GRADE GS14
(10) G017N ACOM DWS ASST DIR - TANF 1 GRADE GS13
(11) N108N DHS/DCO ASST DEP DIR 2 GRADE GS13
(12) N168N DHS DIR HOME & COMMUNITY BASED SVCS 1 GRADE GS12
(13) N167N DHS POLICY & RESEARCH DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS12
(14) N141N DHS/DCO AREA DIRECTOR 7 GRADE GS12
(15) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS11
(16) G100C DHS COUNTY ADMINISTRATOR III 11 GRADE GS10
(17) G288C ACOM DWS DIVISION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(18) G110C ACOM DWS PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(19) G111C DHS COUNTY ADMINISTRATOR II 31 GRADE GS09
(20) G099C DHS PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR 4 GRADE GS09
(21) M014C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY COORDINATOR III 12 GRADE GS09
(22) G081C ACOM DWS DIVISION CHIEF 1 GRADE GS08
(23) G128C ACOM DWS FIELD MANAGER II 3 GRADE GS08
(24) G127C ACOM DWS PROGRAM OPERATIONS MANAGER 5 GRADE GS08
(25) G130C DHS COUNTY ADMINISTRATOR I 39 GRADE GS08
(26) G152C DHS PROGRAM MANAGER 6 GRADE GS08
(27) G129C DHS/DCO PROGRAM MANAGER 2 GRADE GS08
(28) M100C LTSS - PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY SUPERVISOR 18 GRADE GS08
(29) M018C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY COORDINATOR II 33 GRADE GS08
(30) E023C TRAINING PROJECT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(31) G149C ACOM DWS FIELD MANAGER I 5 GRADE GS07
(32) G181C ACOM DWS PROGRAM MONITOR 4 GRADE GS07
(33) G209C ACOM DWS PROGRAM SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS07
(34) G196C ACOM DWS SATELLITE OFFICE SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS07
(35) G183C DHS PROGRAM COORDINATOR 3 GRADE GS07
(36) G267C DHS PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY ANALYST 18 GRADE GS07
(37) M042C DHS STAFF SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS07
(38) G147C GRANTS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(39) M099C LTSS - PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY SPECIALIST 210 GRADE GS07
(40) M025C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY COORDINATOR I 32 GRADE GS07
02-27-2025 14:22:22 LCW013

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1107
(41) M037C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY SUPERVISOR 108 GRADE GS07
(42) X095C QUALITY ASSURANCE ANALYST 5 GRADE GS07
(43) E040C STAFF DEVELOPMENT COORDINATOR 7 GRADE GS07
(44) A092C ACOM DWS FIELD TAX REP 1 GRADE GS06
(45) G217C ACOM DWS WORKFORCE SPECIALIST 29 GRADE GS06
(46) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 14 GRADE GS06
(47) R027C BUDGET SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS06
(48) G210C DHS PROGRAM SPECIALIST 5 GRADE GS06
(49) G180C GRANTS ANALYST 7 GRADE GS06
(50) G214C GRANTS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(51) G178C POLICY DEVELOPMENT COORDINATOR 3 GRADE GS06
(52) M066C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY SPECIALIST 822 GRADE GS06
(53) X154C PUBLIC ASSISTANCE INVESTIGATOR 20 GRADE GS06
(54) X136C QUALITY ASSURANCE REVIEWER 27 GRADE GS06
(55) B076C RESEARCH PROJECT ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
(56) E046C TRAINING INSTRUCTOR 21 GRADE GS06
(57) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 2 GRADE GS05
(58) C030C HEALTH RECORDS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(59) C054C LOCAL OFFICE ADMINISTRATIVE SPEC 34 GRADE GS05
(60) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 13 GRADE GS04
(61) C072C ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
(62) C043C RECORDS MANAGEMENT ANALYST 1 GRADE GS04
(63) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 11 GRADE GS03
(64) C062C LOCAL OFFICE ADMINISTRATIVE ASSISTANT 400 GRADE GS03
(65) C087C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST I 4 GRADE GS02
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 2,013

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Department of Human Services - Division of County Operations - Operations
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or
temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds
appropriated herein for such purposes: forty-three (43) temporary or part-
time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in
the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this
act for the appropriate classification.

02-27-2025 14:22:22 LCW013

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1107
SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the paying account as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of Human Services - Division of
County Operations - Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $90,009,561
(02) EXTRA HELP 503,937
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 36,913,982
(04) OVERTIME 130,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 27,469,893
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 124,000
(C) PROF. FEES 19,037,338
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) DATA PROCESSING SERVICES 20,356,228
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $194,544,939

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - GRANTS - STATE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the
Department of Human Services Grants Fund Account, for grant payments of the
Department of Human Services - Division of County Operations - Grants - State
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) AID TO AGED, BLIND, DISABLED $4,000

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - GRANTS. There is hereby appropriated, to
the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the paying account as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for grant payments of
the Department of Human Services - Division of County Operations - Grants for
02-27-2025 14:22:22 LCW013

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1107
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) TANF BLOCK GRANT $57,200,764
(02) COMMUNITY SERVICE BLOCK GRANT 13,943,475
(03) SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM (SNAP) 5,378,754
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $76,522,993

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - HUNGER COALITION. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the
County Operations Fund Account, for grant payments of the Department of Human
Services - Division of County Operations - Hunger Coalition for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) HUNGER COALITION GRANTS AND AID $995,113

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - COUNTY OPERATIONS - MEDICAID TOBACCO
SETTLEMENT PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Human
Services, to be payable from the Medicaid Expansion Program Account, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Human Services
- Division of County Operations - Medicaid Tobacco Settlement Program for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,677,881
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 704,614
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 197,197
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
02-27-2025 14:22:22 LCW013

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1107
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) DATA PROCESSING SERVICES 50,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,629,692

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - EMERGENCY RENTAL ASSISTANCE GRANTS. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable
from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, for grant payments of the Department of Human Services - Division of
County Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) EMERGENCY RENTAL ASSISTANCE $2,131,685

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - SUMMER EBT. There is hereby appropriated, to
the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the paying account as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for expenses associated
with the Summer EBT of the Department of Human Services - Division of County
Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) SUMMER EBT $50,555,398

SECTION 10. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
OF TANF BLOCK GRANT FUNDS. Each fiscal year, the Department of Human
Services shall transfer the sum of seven million five hundred thousand
dollars ($7,500,000) from the state's federal Temporary Assistance for Needy
Families block grant to the Department of Education Division of Elementary
and Secondary Education Public School Fund Account to be used solely for the
Arkansas Better Chance Program.
If the state match for the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families grant
or the state's Temporary Assistance for Needy Families grant is reduced, the
amount to be transferred may be adjusted in proportion to the percentage
change in the state match or the state's Temporary Assistance for Needy
02-27-2025 14:22:22 LCW013

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1107
Families grant. The amount to be transferred may also be reduced
proportionately if new cost requirements are imposed upon the state as a
result of new or revised Temporary Assistance for Needy Families regulations
at the federal level.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 11. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
RESTRICTIONS ON FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE UNDER THE TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR NEEDY
FAMILIES PROGRAM.
(a)(1) Determining the maximum number of employees, the maximum amount
of appropriation, for what purposes an appropriation is authorized, and
general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year is the
prerogative of the General Assembly.
(2) The purposes of subsection (a) of this section are typically
accomplished by:
(A) Identifying the purpose in the appropriation act;
(B) Delineating such maximums in the appropriation act for a
state agency; and
(C) Delineating the general revenue allocations authorized for
each fund and fund account by amendment to the revenue stabilization law.
(3) It is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly
restrict the use of appropriations authorized in this act.
(b)(1) Upon the request of the Governor or the General Assembly, the
Department of Human Services shall request a waiver from the federal
government to:
(A) Restrict the financial assistance granted to a recipient of
the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program or its successor program
to purchase goods and services that are considered essential and necessary
for the welfare of the family, including without limitation:
(i) Food;
(ii) Clothing;
(iii) Housing;
(iv) Utilities;
(v) Child care; and
02-27-2025 14:22:22 LCW013

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1107
(vi) Incidentals, including without limitation
transportation and medicine or medical supplies or equipment not covered by
either the Arkansas Medicaid Program or the health benefit plan of the
individual; and
(B) Restrict the cash withdrawal from an electronic benefit
transfer card account that receives financial assistance under the Temporary
Assistance for Needy Families Program or its successor program by electronic
benefit transfer system.
(2) If the federal government denies the waiver application, this
section shall not be implemented.
(3) If the division does not request a wavier under subdivision
(b)(1) of this section, the department shall not allocate, budget, expend, or
utilize appropriations under this act for the participation of persons in the
Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 12. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 13. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

02-27-2025 14:22:22 LCW013

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1107
SECTION 14. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee























02-27-2025 14:22:22 LCW013